analizador-foma/qichwa.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [DET] [PRON.Dem] [PRON] [PRON.Prs] [PRON.Refl] [NUM.Card] [NUM] [NUM.Ptv] [ADV] [ADP] [SCONJ] [CCONJ] [INTJ] [ADJ] [N] [VTr] [VInt] +yaA[Transf](VInt) +taA[Transl](VInt) +tsaA[Transl](VInt) +ntin[Tot] +sapa[Augm] +nnaq[Prv] +tsi[Caus] +naA[Prosp] +ykachaA[Disp] +kachaA[Iter] +paA[Exc] +pu[Apl] +kaA[Pass] +nakU[Recp] +raA[Dur] +kU[Refl/Mid] +rpU[DirDown] +rkU[Edu] +rI[Pct] +mu[Cis] +YkaA[Prog] +yku[Intens] +lla[Lim] +maA[1.Obj] +maA+ntsik[3.Sbj/1Pl.Inc.Obj] +maA+rqu[RecPst]+ntsik[3.Sbj/1Pl.Inc.Obj] +shu[3.Sbj]+nki[2.Obj] +shu[3.Sbj]+rqu[RecPst]+nki[2.Obj] +shu[3.Sbj]+nki[2.Obj]+man[Cond] +q[1.Sbj/2.Obj] +q[Agt] +q[Hab] +y[Inf] +nki[2.Sbj] +nqa[3.Sbj.Fut] +n[3.Sbj] +rqa[Pst] +rqu[RecPst] +naq[Rpst] +nki[2.Sbj] +pti[Cnv](N) +pti[Cnv]+q[1.Sbj/2.Obj] +nqa[Sub](N) +r[Cnv](N) +shpa[Grd] +shqa[Prf](N) +rqa[Pst][3] +shaq[Fut.1] +nqa[Fut.3] +shun[Fut][1Pl.Inc] +shqayki[Fut][1.Sbj][2.Obj] +shwan[Cond][1Pl.Inc] +shway[Cond.1Pl.Inc] +na[Pot](N) [3]+naq[Rpst] +yki[2] +ː[1] +nki[2] +n[3] +ntsik[1Pl.Inc] +n[3]+naq[Rpst] +y[Imp.2] +tsun[Imp.3] +shun[Imp.1Pl.Inc] +man[Cond] +ː[Poss.1Sg] +ːkuna[Poss.1Pl.Excl] +yki[Poss.2] +n[Poss.3] +ntsik[Poss.1Pl.Inc] +ː[Poss.1Sg](Pron.Sets) +yki[Poss.2](Pron.Sets) +n[Poss.3](Pron.Sets) +ntsik[Poss.1Pl.Inc](Pron.Sets) +kuna[Pl] +llaA[Lim] +wan[Com] +pita[Abl] +piq[Abl] +ta[Obj] +chaw[Loc] +chuu[Loc] +kama[Ter] +yaq[Ter] +man[All] +pa[Gen] +pa[Prol] +paq[Ben] +yan[Dist] +yuq[Orn] +pa[Man](ADV) +taq[Ctrs] +taa[Ctrs] +tan[Ctrs] +na[Acp] +raq[Inacp] +ran[Inacp] +pa[Man]+yan[Dist] +naw[Equ] +pis[Coord] +qa[Top] +mi[Asrt] +shi[Nfh] +chi[Conjc] +tsu[Neg]:^tsu +ku[Inter] +ri[Emp] [ADV]+na[Disc] [ADV]+lla[Lim] [ADV]+taq[Ctrs] [ADV]+ku[Inter] @P.I.ON@ @D.I@

LEXICON Root
Adv ;
Adj ;
Det ;
Noun ;
VTr ;
VInt ;
Aux;
Num ;
Interj ;
Pron ;
PronDem ;
PronPers ;
PronReflx ;
Conj ;
Adp ;
PropNoun ;
AdvEsp ;
Cop;

LEXION Cop
kaq CopTag;

LEXICON Det
tsay InvarDet;
kay InvarDet;
hay InvarDet;
chay InvarDet;
taqay InvarDet;
wak InvarDet;
kada InvarDet;
huk	InvarDet;
ima InvarDet;
hukllaylla InvarDet;
hukllaqlla InvarDet;
el InvarDet;
la InvarDet;
las InvarDet;
los InvarDet;

LEXICON Pron
llapa MayqaDeriv;
mayqa MayqaDeriv;
hinantin MayqaDeriv;
wakin PronFlex;
ayka LlaaSlotPron;
pi LlaaSlotPron;
ima LlaaSlotPron;
imay LlaaSlotPron;
may LlaaSlotPron;
maylaya LlaaSlotPron;
imayka	LlaaSlotPron;
tsaytsika	LlaaSlotPron;
mayna LlaaSlotPron;
imana LlaaSlotPron;
imanir PronInt;

!! DEICTIQUES !!
tsay LlaaSlotDeict;
hay LlaaSlotDeict;
kay LlaaSlotDeict;
tsay AdvDeict;

LEXICON PronReflx
kiki Reflex;
hapalla Reflex;

LEXICON PronDem
tsay PronDeriv;
kay PronDeriv;
hay PronDeriv;
taqay PronDeriv;
wak PronDeriv;
huk PronDerivHuk;

LEXICON PronPers
nuqa Prs;
nuqakuna Prs;
qam Prs;
qamkuna Prs;
pay Prs;
paykuna Prs;
nuqantsik Prs;


LEXICON Num
huk NumRoot;
ishka NumRoot;
kima NumRoot;
chusku NumRoot;
pistqa NumRoot;
huqta NumRoot;

ishkaq NumPart;
kimaq NumPart;
chuskuq NumPart;
pitsqaq NumPart;
huqtaq NumPart;
chunkaq NumPart;

huk NumCard;
ishkay NumCard;
kimsa NumCard;
kima NumCard;
kinsa NumCard;
chusku NumCard;
pitsqa NumCard;
huqta NumCard;
suqta NumCard;
qanchis NumCard;
pusaq NumCard;
puwaq NumCard;
ishqun NumCard;
isqun NumCard;
chunka NumCard;
pachak NumCard;
waranqa NumCard;

!! PRESTAMOS !! mover a sistema separado con reglas e -/ i, o -/ u
uno NumCard;
dos NumCard;
tres NumCard;
kwatru NumCard;
sinko NumCard;
sinku NumCard;
seis NumCard;
syete NumCard;
syeti NumCard;
ocho NumCard;
nwebi NumCard;
dyes NumCard;
onsi NumCard;
dose NumCard;
dosi NumCard;
trese NumCard;
beynti NumCard;
medya NumCard;

LEXICON Aux
ka	AuxTag;

! ------------- Invariable roots ------------- !
LEXICON AdvEsp
ademas AdvInvar;
allibwenu AdvNaSlot;
apenas	AdvInvar;
apuradu AdvInvar;
demasyadu AdvNaSlot;
despwes	AdvNaSlot;
entonsis AdvNaSlot;
felismente AdvInvar;
inmedyatamente AdvInvar;
kasi AdvInvar;
kisaa AdvNaSlot;
komo AdvInvar; ! podría ser SCONJ
lomismu AdvInvar;
mas AdvNaSlot;
mehor AdvNaSlot;
mejor AdvNaSlot;
nunka AdvInvar;
poku AdvNaSlot;
porfin AdvNaSlot;
serka AdvInvar;
sikyera AdvInvar;
talbes AdvNaSlot;
todabia AdvInvar;
unikamente AdvInvar;
sellaama AdvNaSlot;
sellama AdvNaSlot;
syempri AdvInvar;

LEXICON Adp
a AdpEsp;
asta AdpEsp;
desde AdpEsp;
hasta AdpEsp;
segun AdpEsp;
sin AdpEsp;
de AdpEsp;

LEXICON Conj
porke Sconj;
si Sconj;
sitsun Sconj;
i Cconj;
y Cconj;
o Cconj;
ni Cconj;
pero Cconj;
peru Cconj;
sino Cconj;

LEXICON Interj
aatsaq Intj;
achachaaw Intj;
achachaw Intj;
achachii Intj;
achallaaw Intj;
aachi Intj;
achyaa Intj;
achyaari Intj;
ahaan Intj;
aku Intj;
alalaw Intj;
alalay Intj;
allaaw Intj;
ananaaw Intj;
añañaaw Intj;
aashi Intj;
ari Intj;
atataaw Intj;
aw Intj;
awmi Intj;
ayaal Intj;
aywallaa Intj;
bwenu Intj;
chap-chap-chap Intj;
chisha Intj;
dyosulupaaki Intj;
haw Intj;
haay Intj;
hipipra Intj;
hishcho Intj;
mana Intj;
nadiiyas Intj;
paa Intj;
paqta Intj;
soo Intj;
shay Intj;
shimikichaay Intj;
tuq-tuq-tuq Intj;
uku Intj;
wapu Intj;
waw Intj;
wichichiq Intj;
winchis Intj;
wishik Intj;
yaw Intj;
yosulpaaki Intj;

!-------------------------------------------------- !
!                     ROOT TAGS                     !
!---------------------------------------------------!
LEXICON InvarDet
[DET]:0 #;

LEXICON CopTag
[COP]:0 #;

LEXICON PronDeriv
[PRON.Dem]+kuna[Pl]:^kuna Indep;
[PRON.Dem]+ta[Obj]:^ta	CasePron;
[PRON.Dem]+pa[Gen]:^pa Indep;
[PRON.Dem]+wan[Com]:^wan Indep;
[PRON.Dem]+paq[Ben]:^paq Indep;
[PRON.Dem]+yuq[Orn]:yuq CasePron;
[PRON.Dem]+qa[Top]:^qa #;
[PRON.Dem]+mi[Asrt]:^mi #;
LlaaSlotPron;

LEXICON PronDerivHuk
[PRON]:0 CasePron;

LEXICON Prs
[PRON.Prs]:0 LlaaSlot;

LEXICON Reflex
[PRON.Refl]:0 PossMark;

!---------- Numerals / Conj / Adp -------------!

LEXICON NumCard
[NUM.Card]:0 Case;
[NUM.Card]:0 Hour;
[NUM]:0 AdvNum;

LEXICON NumRoot
[NUM]:0 PossMarkNum;

LEXICON NumPart
[NUM.Ptv]:0 Indep;

LEXICON AdvInvar
[ADV]:0 #;

LEXICON AdvDeict
[PRON]+naw[Equ]:^naw LlaaSlot;


LEXICON Advinf
[ADV]:0 LlaaSlot;

LEXICON AdvNaSlot
[ADV]:0 NaSlot;

LEXICON AdpEsp
[ADP]:0 #;

LEXICON Sconj
[SCONJ]:0 #;

LEXICON Cconj
[CCONJ]:0 #;
[CCONJ]+qa[Top]:^qa #;

LEXICON Intj
[INTJ]:0 Emph;

LEXICON Adjinf
[ADJ]:0 Evidential;
[ADJ]+llaA[Lim]:^lla AdjToAdv;
[ADJ]:0 NounToVerb;
[ADJ]:0 AdjToAdv;

LEXICON AdjToAdv
+pa[Man](Adv):^pa #;
+ta[Obj](Adv):^ta #;
#;

!--------------- NOUN INFLECTION ----------------- !
LEXICON Ninf
[N]:0 #;
[N]: Case;
[N]: LlaaSlot1;
![N]: Pred;
[N]: NounToVerb;

LEXICON NounToVerb
+yaA[Transf](VInt):^yaa S1;
+taA[Transl](VInt):^taa S1;
+tsaA[Transl](VInt):^tsaa S1; !tsaa+tsi

LEXICON Pred
+ntin[Tot]:^ntin Indep;
+sapa[Augm]:^sapa Indep;
+nnaq[Prv]:^nnaq Indep;
+yuq[Orn]:^yuq Indep;

!--------------- VERB INFLECTION ------------------ !
LEXICON AuxTag
[AUX]: S1;

LEXICON VTrDeriv
[VTr]: S1;

LEXICON VIntDeriv
[VInt]: S1;

LEXICON S1
+tsi[Caus]:^tsi S2;
+naA[Prosp]:^naa S2;
+naA[Prosp]:^na S2;
+ykachaA[Disp]:^ykachaa S2;
+kachaA[Iter]:^kachaa S2;
S2;

LEXICON S2
+paA[Exc]:^paa S3;
+pu[Apl]:^pu S3;
S3;

LEXICON S3
+kaA[Pass]:^kaa S4;
+kaA[Pass]:^ka S4;
+nakU[Recp]:^naku S5;
+nakU[Recp]:^naka S5;
+raA[Dur]:^raa S4;
S4;

LEXICON S4
+kU[Refl/Mid]:^ku S5;
S5;

LEXICON S5
+rpU[DirDown]:^rpu S6;
S6;

LEXICON S6
+raA[Dur]:^raa S7;
S7;

LEXICON S7
+rkU[Edu]:^rka S8;
S8;

LEXICON S8
@P.I.ON@+rI[Pct]:@P.I.ON@^ri S10;
+rI[Pct]:^ra S9;
S9;

LEXICON S9
+mu[Cis]:^mu S10;
S10;

LEXICON S10
+YkaA[Prog]:^ykaa S11; 
+YkaA[Prog]:^yka S11;
S11;

LEXICON S11
@D.I@+tsi[Caus]:@D.I@^tsi S12;
S12;

LEXICON S12
+rku[Edu]:^rku S13;
+yku[Intens]:^yku S13;
S13;

LEXICON S13
+llaa[Lim]:^llaa S14;
S14;

LEXICON S14
+yaA[VPl]:^yaa S15;
+yaA[VPl]:^ya S15;
S15;

LEXICON S15
+pu[Apl]:^pu Vflex;
+mu[Cis]:^mu Subord;
+pa[Apl]:^pa S16;
S16;

LEXICON Adv
ahalla Advinf;
allaapa Advinf;
alli Advinf;
allinta Advinf;
alliq Advinf;
apuraypa Advinf;
arday Advinf;
achka Advinf;
atska Advinf;
atskaq Advinf;
asiitsu Advinf;
tsaa Advinf;
tsaylaya AdvInvar;
charaq Advinf;
hankat Advinf;
hawka Advinf;
hinampi Advinf;
huklla Advinf;
hukpita Advinf;
hunaq-hunaq Advinf;
itsan Advinf;
ichikpa-ichikpa AdvInvar;
illaqpita Advinf;
kanqan Advinf;
kaynaw Advinf;
koosa Advinf;
limpu Advinf;
lluta Advinf;
maa	Advinf;
masyaadu Advinf;
mitanakuypa Advinf;
naaqa Advinf;
nish Advinf;
ñaa Advinf;
patsaypi Advinf;
paqta Advinf;
paqwaypa Advinf;
ponchushqa Advinf;
qalapachaw Advinf;
qisqa-qisqa Advinf;
quyati Advinf;
raqus-raqus Advinf;
saqtu-saqtu Advinf;
taqaylla Advinf;
tempranu Advinf;
tsaypin Advinf;
tutay Advinf;
wakpa Advinf;
wamaq Advinf;
waraanin Advinf;
waraati Advinf;
waraynin Advinf;
watanpa Advinf;
wayralla Advinf;
winaylla Advinf;
yamay Advinf;
LEXICON Adj
alli Adjinf;
ankash Adjinf;
asqu Adjinf;
byuda Adjinf;
chichu Adjinf;
chiri Adjinf;
desenti	Adjinf;
fiilu Adjinf;
hatun-karay Adjinf;
hikan Adjinf;
huytu Adjinf;
iska Adjinf;
kanan Adjinf;
kichki Adjinf;
lapsu Adjinf;
limpu Adjinf;
llapan Adjinf;
lliki Adjinf;
luqtu Adjinf;
mallaq Adjinf;
micha Adjinf;
moochu Adjinf;
murqu Adjinf;
ña Adjinf;
ñapu Adjinf;
pakla Adjinf;
piña Adjinf;
puqu Adjinf;
qachqa Adjinf;
qallapacha Adjinf;
qanra Adjinf;
qapya Adjinf;
qashpa Adjinf;
qinru Adjinf;
qunchi Adjinf;
qushru Adjinf;
rakta Adjinf;
rata Adjinf;
ruqya Adjinf;
saqsa Adjinf;
sasa Adjinf;
shumaq Adjinf;
sinchi Adjinf;
suqru Adjinf;
tankas Adjinf;
tilti Adjinf;
tsalla Adjinf;
tsuya Adjinf;
upa Adjinf;
waapu Adjinf;
wamalliishu Adjinf;
waya Adjinf;
willqu Adjinf;
wiswi Adjinf;
LEXICON Noun
akisha Ninf;
allwi Ninf;
anaaku Ninf;
anqush Ninf;
aputu Ninf;
arooba Ninf;
awilu Ninf;
bruñina Ninf;
chila Ninf;
chunin Ninf;
flawta Ninf;
hara Ninf;
hupay Ninf;
ishanka Ninf;
kallki Ninf;
karpinteru piŝqu Ninf;
kinwa Ninf;
kostal Ninf;
laasu Ninf;
llankawasi Ninf;
llutu Ninf;
mallwa Ninf;
matkush Ninf;
miyu Ninf;
naani Ninf;
ñushpi Ninf;
palma Ninf;
paska Ninf;
pilta Ninf;
piwincha Ninf;
puntinkuy Ninf;
puywan Ninf;
qaracha Ninf;
qipi Ninf;
qunqapa Ninf;
rakacha Ninf;
rayaan Ninf;
saaya Ninf;
shalla Ninf;
shillshill Ninf;
shullya Ninf;
siti Ninf;
taytay Ninf;
triilla Ninf;
tsulla Ninf;
tupu Ninf;
ullka Ninf;
urqu Ninf;
wachapakuy Ninf;
wanti Ninf;
warqu Ninf;
wayruru Ninf;
wira Ninf;
yuka Ninf;
LEXICON VTr
akra VTrDeriv;
alla VTrDeriv;
ankashlla VTrDeriv;
apsi VTrDeriv;
arma VTrDeriv;
ashi VTrDeriv;
awi VTrDeriv;
aypu VTrDeriv;
tsakma VTrDeriv;
tsapi VTrDeriv;
tsilli VTrDeriv;
tuqli VTrDeriv;
chaqna VTrDeriv;
chichi VTrDeriv;
chipsi VTrDeriv;
churku VTrDeriv;
haqatsaa VTrDeriv;
hipi VTrDeriv;
huqa VTrDeriv;
iski VTrDeriv;
kamatsi VTrDeriv;
katu VTrDeriv;
korrala VTrDeriv;
lapta VTrDeriv;
llaki VTrDeriv;
lluuma VTrDeriv;
machka VTrDeriv;
markaaku VTrDeriv;
minka VTrDeriv;
nana VTrDeriv;
ñuñu VTrDeriv;
panka VTrDeriv;
pilta VTrDeriv;
puchqa VTrDeriv;
qallu VTrDeriv;
qashpa VTrDeriv;
qishu VTrDeriv;
qutu VTrDeriv;
rikaa VTrDeriv;
rura VTrDeriv;
sigi VTrDeriv;
shana VTrDeriv;
shinti VTrDeriv;
shuqshi VTrDeriv;
taapa VTrDeriv;
tiksha VTrDeriv;
tumpa VTrDeriv;
uksi VTrDeriv;
urya VTrDeriv;
wallqa VTrDeriv;
wasa VTrDeriv;
witsa VTrDeriv;
wiqtu VTrDeriv;
yanaqaa VTrDeriv;
LEXICON VInt
achachatsiku S5;
ahayaa VIntDeriv;
alalaatsiku S5;
allanka VIntDeriv;
anqa VIntDeriv;
asqa VIntDeriv;
aya VIntDeriv;
booya VIntDeriv;
chasu VIntDeriv;
chipipi VIntDeriv;
chuqa VIntDeriv;
falta	VIntDeriv;
hamarpa VIntDeriv;
hikpa VIntDeriv;
hirunyaa VIntDeriv;
hutsa VIntDeriv;
illaqu VIntDeriv;
intii VIntDeriv;
isqicha VIntDeriv;
karkaryaa VIntDeriv;
kostra VIntDeriv;
laata VIntDeriv;
liqliqtsaa VIntDeriv;
lliqlli VIntDeriv;
luqluqyaa VIntDeriv;
mallma VIntDeriv;
mismi VIntDeriv;
muqtsi VIntDeriv;
ñaka VIntDeriv;
ñushpi VIntDeriv;
paqta VIntDeriv;
patataa VIntDeriv;
pichiilla VIntDeriv;
pishi VIntDeriv;
pukutaa VIntDeriv;
punukaakayku VIntDeriv;
puri VIntDeriv;
puwa VIntDeriv;
qarishpaa VIntDeriv;
qimtsi VIntDeriv;
qisqa VIntDeriv;
qurya VIntDeriv;
raqra VIntDeriv;
rikcha VIntDeriv;
ruqya VIntDeriv;
shatataa VIntDeriv;
shuka VIntDeriv;
shushu VIntDeriv;
taprakya VIntDeriv;
tiwya VIntDeriv;
tsuktsukyaa VIntDeriv;
uhuku VIntDeriv;
urwa VIntDeriv;
ushaku S5;
uushuku S5;
wañu VIntDeriv;
wiksanaa VIntDeriv;
wiyaraari VIntDeriv;
wiyarpu S6;
yarpaykachaa S2;
